Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1176.
do enact as follows:AB1176,11Section 1. 20.255 (2) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1176,2,6220.255 (2) (b) Aids for special education and school age parents programs. The 3amounts in the schedule A sum sufficient for the payment of the full cost of special 4education for children in hospitals and convalescent homes under s. 115.88 (4) and 5for the payment of aids for special education and school age parents programs 6under ss. 115.88, 115.93 and 118.255 as provided under s. 115.882.AB1176,21Section 2. 115.882 of the statutes is amended to read:AB1176,3,82115.882 Payment of state aid; reimbursement rate. Funds appropriated 3under s. 20.255 (2) (b) shall be used first for the purpose of s. 115.88 (4). Costs In 4the 2025-26 school year and in each school year thereafter, costs eligible for 5reimbursement from the appropriation under s. 20.255 (2) (b) under ss. 115.88 (1m) 6to (3), (6), and (8), 115.93, and 118.255 (4) shall be reimbursed at a rate set to 7distribute the full amount appropriated for reimbursement for the costs, not to 8exceed 100 percent 60 percent of eligible costs.AB1176,39Section 3. 118.40 (2r) (e) 2p. a. of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin 10Act 15, is amended to read:AB1176,3,1611118.40 (2r) (e) 2p. a. Add the amounts appropriated in the current fiscal year 12under s. 20.255 (2), except s. 20.255 (2) (ac), (aw), (az), (b), (bb), (dj), (du), (fc), (fm), 13(fp), (fq), (fr), (fu), (k), and (m); and s. 20.505 (4) (es); and the amount, as determined 14by the secretary of administration, of the appropriation under s. 20.505 (4) (s) 15allocated for payments to telecommunications providers under contracts with 16school districts and cooperative educational service agencies under s. 16.971 (13).AB1176,417Section 4. Initial applicability.AB1176,3,2118(1) Change in statewide categorical aid per pupil determination. The 19treatment of s. 118.40 (2r) (e) 2p. a. first applies to the determination of the change 20in the amount of statewide categorical aid per pupil between the 2025-26 school 21year and the 2026-27 school year.AB1176,522Section 5. Fiscal changes.AB1176,4,223(1) General school aids. In the schedule under s. 20.005 (3) for the 1appropriation to the department of public instruction under s. 20.255 (2) (ac), the 2dollar amount for fiscal year 2026-27 is increased by $445,949,400.AB1176,4,33